Illinois, session 104th, HB1454.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 4-14.1 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/4-14.1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 4-14.1)7    Sec. 4-14.1. Cancellation Cancelation of deceased voter's 8registration. 9    (a) Upon establishment of an electronic reporting system 10for death registrations as provided in the Vital Records Act, 11the county clerk of the county where a decedent last resided, 12as indicated on the decedent's death certificate, shall may 13issue certifications of death records from that system and 14shall may use that system to cancel the registration of any 15person who has died during the preceding month. Regardless of 16whether or not such a system has been established, it is the 17duty of the county clerk to examine, monthly, the records 18deposited in his or her office pursuant to the Vital Records 19Act that relate to deaths in the county, and to cancel the 20registration of any person who has died during the preceding 21month. The county coroner, medical examiner, or physician for 22a county or any other individual responsible for certification 23of death under Section 18 of the Vital Records Act shall   HB1454- 2 -LRB104 07810 SPS 17856 b1promptly transmit certified records to the county clerk within 27 days after the death of the decedent. The county clerk and 3coroner shall report quarterly to its affiliated county board 4and certify its full compliance with this Section and accuracy 5of the voter rolls.6    (b) Any person may request a copy of the report required in 7subsection (a). Failure to provide an accurate report by the 8county clerk within 5 business days, or 48 hours if 30 days 9before an election, may file suit for injunction or 10declaratory relief to enforce subsection (a) or this 11subsection (b). 12    (c) The circuit court shall have the jurisdiction to order 13the following: (i) production of deposits of records; (ii) 14production of required reports; and (iii) compliance with 15subsection (a), including establishing the accuracy of the 16voter registration rolls. 17    (d) If a person seeking the right to receive a copy of the 18documents pursuant to subsection (a) or enforce the provision 19of subsection (a) prevails in a proceeding under this Section, 20the court shall award such person reasonable attorney's fees 21and costs. In determining what amount of attorney's fees is 22reasonable, the court shall consider the degree to which the 23relief obtained relates to the relief sought. 24    (e) If the court determines that a public body willfully 25and intentionally failed to comply with this Section, or 26otherwise acted in bad faith, the court shall also impose upon   HB1454- 3 -LRB104 07810 SPS 17856 b1the public body a civil penalty of not less than $2,500 nor 2more than $5,000 for each occurrence. In assessing the civil 3penalty, the court shall consider in aggravation or mitigation 4the budget of the public body and whether the public body has 5previously been assessed penalties for violations of this 6Section. The court may impose an additional penalty of up to 7$1,000 for each day the violation continues if: 8        (1) the public body fails to comply with the court's 9    order after 30 days; 10        (2) the court's order is not on appeal or stayed; and 11        (3) the court does not grant the public body 12    additional time to comply with the court's order to 13    disclose public records. 14(Source: P.A. 96-1484, eff. 1-1-11.)